Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.013

Salaries of members of the legislature.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 2025SALARYSCHEDULE.SL) ***

Pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 43.03.010 and 43.03.310, the annual salary of members of the legislature shall be:

(1) Effective July 1, 2022:

(a) Legislators. . . . $57,876

(b) Speaker of the house. . . . $66,016

(c) Senate majority leader. . . . $66,016

(d) House minority leader. . . . $61,946

(e) Senate minority leader. . . . $61,946

(2) Effective July 1, 2023:

(a) Legislators. . . . $60,191

(b) Speaker of the house. . . . $68,657

(c) Senate majority leader. . . . $68,657

(d) House minority leader. . . . $64,424

(e) Senate minority leader. . . . $64,424

(3) Effective July 1, 2024:

(a) Legislators. . . . $61,997

(b) Speaker of the house. . . . $70,717

(c) Senate majority leader. . . . $70,717

(d) House minority leader. . . . $66,357

(e) Senate minority leader. . . . $66,357

[2023 c 1 s 3; 2021 c 1 s 3; 2019 c 5 s 3; 2017 1st sp.s. c 1 s 3; 2015 1st sp.s. c 1 s 3; 2013 c 340 s 3; 2011 c 380 s 3; 2009 c 581 s 3; 2007 c 524 s 3; 2005 c 519 s 3; 2003 1st sp.s. c 1 s 3; 2001 1st sp.s. c 3 s 3; 1999 sp.s. c 3 s 3; 1997 c 458 s 3; 1995 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 3; 1993 sp.s. c 26 s 3; 1991 sp.s. c 1 s 3; 1989 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 3; 1987 1st ex.s. c 1 s 1, part.]